Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1405
Agricultural data; prohibited acts.

(1) A controller or processor shall not engage in the sale of agricultural data without the express written consent of the agricultural producer.

(2) Written consent for the sale of agricultural data shall be obtained through a clear and conspicuous disclosure that is separate from the primary terms of service or data use agreement.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 5.
July 18, 2026